Utah statutes.
40-8-12.   Objectives.
The objectives of mined land reclamation are:
(1)  to return the land, concurrently with mining or within a reasonable
amount of time thereafter, to a stable ecological condition compatible with
past, present, and probable future local land uses;
(2)  to minimize or prevent present and future on-site or off-site
environmental degradation caused by mining operations to the ecologic and
hydrologic regimes and to meet other pertinent state and federal regulations
regarding air and water quality standards and health and safety criteria; and
(3)  to minimize or prevent future hazards to public safety and welfare.
